src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Burmese language verbs inflect.

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON V
+Realis+Nom:တာ   # ;
+Realis:တယ်  # ;
+Irrealis:မယ် # ;
+Irrealis+Nom:မှာ    # ;
+Imperative: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
