src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Burmese language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
ပြော V ;
သွား V ;
ဖတ် V ;
ကြိုက် V ;
စား V ;
စီး V ;
ဖက် V ;
လုပ် V ;
ချစ်  V ;
ပေး  V ;
 

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!!€သွား-norm: verb
!!€ သွားတာ:    သွား+V+Realis+Nom
!!€ သွားတယ်:     သွား+V+Realis
!!€ သွားမှာ:    သွား+V+Irrealis+Nom
!!€ သွားမယ်:     သွား+V+Irrealis
